Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-56] Service of charges. The
trial counsel to whom court-martial charges are referred for trial shall cause
to be served upon the accused a copy of the charges upon which trial is to be
had. In time of peace no person may, against the person's objection, be
brought to trial before a general court-martial within a period of five days
after the service of the charges upon the person, or before a special
court-martial within a period of three days after the service of the charges
upon the person. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next